Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 Management of Budgetary and Financial Affairs
45-12-85.
Examination and investigation of periodic work programs and requests for allotment of funds.

The Governor shall examine the periodic work programs and shall make or cause to have made such further investigations by the Office of Planning and Budget, with such hearings before the Governor as he or she deems advisable, and shall direct changes in such provisions of the periodic work program as the Governor finds do not conform to the budget approved by the General Assembly.

The Governor through the Office of Planning and Budget shall seek to effect economy, efficiency, decentralization of state government, and sound fiscal management in reviewing budget allotment requests and may make such changes to the budget allotment requests to meet these goals and objectives and which are consistent with and subject to the method and provisions contained in the General Appropriations Act. Upon determination that the requested budget allotment conforms with the approved work program and meets the above-mentioned goals and objectives, the Governor shall execute his or her warrant on the treasury for the funds included in the approved budget allotment. Notwithstanding any authorization for expenditure included in an appropriations Act, all appropriations in excess of the approved budget allotments for the budget year, as determined by the Office of Planning and Budget, shall cease to be an obligation of the state. The Office of Planning and Budget shall notify the House Budget and Research Office and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office of any such action with appropriate supporting information.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-417, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 10; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-17/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Budget and Research Office and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office” for “House Budget Office and the Senate Budget Office” in the last sentence of subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “consistent” was substituted for “consistant” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-86.
Governor authorized to require state agencies to reserve specified appropriations for budget reductions and withhold a percentage of agency allotments to maintain spending within actual revenues.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the Governor, during the first six months of a fiscal year period in which the current revenue estimate on which appropriations are based is expected to exceed actual revenues, is authorized to require state agencies to reserve such appropriations as specified by the Governor for budget reductions to be recommended to the General Assembly at its next regular session.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the Governor, during any fiscal year by which the current revenue estimate on which appropriations are based is expected to exceed actual revenues, is authorized to withhold a percentage of agency allotment requests as necessary to maintain spending within actual revenues.

During any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2009, in which the current revenue estimate on which appropriations are based is expected to exceed actual revenues and an appropriation for homeowner tax relief grants pursuant to Chapter 89 of Title 36 has been made which does not comply with the limitations specified under subsection (d) of Code Section 36-89-3, the Governor shall either require the state agency to which the appropriation was made to reserve such appropriations as specified by the Governor for budget reductions to be recommended to the General Assembly at its next regular session or withhold the agency allotment request for such appropriation as necessary to maintain spending within actual revenues.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-418, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 4/HB 509; Ga. L. 2009, p. 1, § 2/HB 143; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 45/SB 46.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”

45-12-87.
Requirement of authorization of payments and obligation; liability of persons authorizing payments or receiving payments.

No payment shall be made and no obligation shall be incurred against any appropriation unless such payment or obligation has been authorized as provided in this part. Every official authorizing payments in violation of this part, or taking part therein, and every person receiving such payment, or any part thereof, shall be jointly and severally liable to the state for the full amount so paid or received.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-419, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-88.
[Reserved] Budget units to furnish information to Budgetary Responsibility Oversight Committee before instituting new programs.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 637, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 4; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-3, effective January 28, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-3 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 28, 2008.

45-12-89.
Appropriations not expended or obligated at end of fiscal year to lapse.

At the end of each fiscal year, the amount of each appropriation provided for in this part, except for the mandatory appropriations required by the Constitution of Georgia, remaining unexpended and not contractually obligated in writing shall lapse and cease to be available; and the state treasury shall not pay any unallotted appropriations and shall make the necessary adjustments in its appropriation accounts to charge off the amount of the lapsed appropriations. All appropriated funds, except for the mandatory appropriations required by the Constitution of Georgia, remaining unexpended and not contractually obligated at the expiration of the General Appropriations Act shall lapse.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-420, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 673, § 9.

45-12-90.
Disposition of appropriation for duties, purposes, and objects which have been transferred.

In the event that any duties, purposes, and objects for which appropriations are made shall be transferred to a budget unit other than that to which appropriated, the appropriations for such duties, purposes, and objects shall be made available, subject to this part, to such budget unit or budget units to which the duties, purposes, and objects are transferred. Should the appropriation to be transferred not be shown in the appropriation Act as a separate and identifiable item, the amount to be transferred shall be decided by the Office of Planning and Budget in accordance with the detailed estimates or other information embodied in the budget report.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-421, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-91.
Federal funds received by state continually appropriated.

All federal funds received by the state are continually appropriated in the exact amounts and for the purposes authorized and directed by the federal government in making the grant.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-422, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

45-12-92.
Revenue collections to be paid to state treasury on monthly basis; effect of failure of budget unit to comply with Code section; user fee defined; reporting.

All departments, agencies, and budget units charged with the duty of collecting taxes, fees, assessments, or other moneys, the collection of which is imposed by law, if required, shall pay all revenues collected by them into the state treasury on a monthly basis on or before the fifteenth day of each month for the immediately preceding month’s collections, according to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Office of Planning and Budget. No allotment of funds shall be made to any budget unit which has failed to comply fully with this Code section.

As used in this subsection, the term “user fee” shall mean voluntary or mandatory payments made in exchange for a government good or service provided specifically to the fee payer. A revenue source meets this definition if the authorization for the fee explicitly or implicitly ties the fee to the activities of a specific program, such as a licensing fee charged by a regulatory program. Fines, penalties, late fees, or similar punitive charges are not included in this definition.

All departments, agencies, and budget units charged with the duty of collecting user fees, the collection of which is authorized by law or regulation, shall compile a separate annual report to be submitted to the Office of Planning and Budget showing:

The statute or regulation authorizing a user fee;

The user fee amount;

The goods or services associated with the user fee and the estimated cost of such goods or services;

The total amount collected from the user fee in the current fiscal year; and

Whether the user fee has been retained by the department, agency, or budget unit or remitted to the state treasury.

The report provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall also contain any proposal that the budget unit may have to:

Create a new fee, or change, reauthorize, or terminate an existing fee, which shall include a description of the associated service or product provided or the regulatory function performed; and

Adjust an existing fee rate or amount. Each new or adjusted fee rate shall be accompanied by information justifying the proposed rate adjustment which may include:

The relationship between the revenue to be raised by the fee or change in the fee and the cost or change in the cost of the service, product, or regulatory function supported by the fee, with costs construed as actual costs incurred;

The inflationary pressures that have arisen since the fee was last set;

The effect on budgetary adequacy if the fee is not increased;

The existence of comparable fees in other jurisdictions;

Policies that might affect the acceptance or the viability of the fee amount;

Any proposal to designate, or redesignate, the fund into which revenue from a fee is to be deposited; and

Other relevant considerations.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall compile and publish on the Open Georgia website, open.georgia.gov, a report showing for each department, agency, or other budget unit the data collected pursuant to this subsection.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-423, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 112, § 1/HB 1284; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142.

45-12-92.1.
Fees which are not revenue measures; utilization of proceeds.

The General Assembly finds and determines that certain fees imposed or authorized by law are not “revenue measures” within the meaning of Article VII, Section III, Paragraph II of the Constitution but only incidentally create revenue pursuant to the facilitation of another primary purpose.

When any other provision of law imposes or authorizes the imposition of a fee and recites that such fee is subject to this Code section:

The agency or other entity imposing and collecting the fee shall not pay the proceeds of the fee into the general fund of the state treasury but shall rather retain and expend the proceeds for purposes of defraying the costs of administering the program or activity with which the fee is associated; and

If the amount of the fee is fixed by the agency or other entity pursuant to the law authorizing the fee, the fee shall be fixed in a reasonable amount such that the proceeds of the fee do not exceed the total direct and indirect costs of administering the program or activity with which the fee is associated.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-92.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-84.1/HB 1055.

Cross references.

Provider Payment Agreement Act, T. 31, C. 8, A. 6.

45-12-92.2.
[Repealed] Definitions; procedures involving solid waste disposal surcharge and tire disposal fees; conditions; appropriation.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-92.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 856, § 5/HB 276; Ga. L. 2019, p. 261, § 4/HB 220; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 15/HB 511, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 761, § 15/HB 511 provides for the repeal of this Code section effective July 1, 2022.

45-12-93.
Revenue shortfall reserve; reservation of surplus state funds; appropriation and release of funds; limitations.

There shall be a reserve of state funds known as the “Revenue Shortfall Reserve.”

The amount of all surplus in state funds existing as of the end of each fiscal year shall be reserved and added to the Revenue Shortfall Reserve. Funds in the Revenue Shortfall Reserve shall carry forward from fiscal year to fiscal year, without reverting to the general fund at the end of a fiscal year. The Revenue Shortfall Reserve shall be maintained, accumulated, appropriated, and otherwise disbursed only as provided in this Code section.

For each existing fiscal year, the General Assembly may appropriate from the Revenue Shortfall Reserve an amount up to 1 percent of the net revenue collections of the preceding fiscal year for funding increased K-12 needs.

The Governor may release for appropriation by the General Assembly a stated amount from funds in the Revenue Shortfall Reserve that are in excess of 4 percent of the net revenue of the preceding fiscal year.

As of the end of each fiscal year, an amount shall be released from the Revenue Shortfall Reserve to the general fund to cover any deficit by which total expenditures and contractual obligations of state funds authorized by appropriation exceed net revenue and other amounts in state funds made available for appropriation.

The combined Revenue Shortfall Reserve and the Midyear Adjustment Reserve existing on May 9, 2005, shall become the Revenue Shortfall Reserve provided for in this Code section.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the General Assembly is authorized to appropriate $7 million for State Fiscal Year 2005 from the Revenue Shortfall Reserve.

The Revenue Shortfall Reserve shall not exceed 15 percent of the previous fiscal year’s net revenue for any given fiscal year.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 420, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1288, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1815, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 252, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1505, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 976, § 5/HB 509; Ga. L. 2010, p. 166, § 1/SB 421.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “May 9, 2005,” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” in subsection (f).

45-12-94.
Striking of name of employee from requisition for allotment of funds.

Neither the Governor nor the Office of Planning and Budget shall have the power to strike arbitrarily the name of any individual employed by the state from a requisition for allotment of funds or from the budget of any budget unit, department, or agency of the state government.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-424, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

Cross references.

Procedure for hearing complaints regarding misconduct, malfeasance, and incompetence of state employee, §

45-5-7

.

45-12-95.
Duty of Office of Planning and Budget to encourage state agencies to identify and implement cost-saving measures and to decentralize state government.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage state agencies to identify and implement cost-saving measures and to decentralize state government.

It is the duty of the Office of Planning and Budget to assist state agencies in identifying and implementing measures that provide current services to the public at a reduced cost or improved services to the public at the same cost and that whenever possible, consistent with such objectives, those services be administered or provided from facilities that are decentralized.

The Office of Planning and Budget is authorized to encourage state agencies to identify and propose cost-saving initiatives by establishing a system of financial incentives. A cost-saving initiative shall include a description of the proposed action to effect a cost reduction and the proposed use of the resulting savings. A system of financial incentives to encourage agencies to identify and propose cost-saving initiatives shall include the following provisions:

Any agency that implements an approved cost-saving initiative shall be eligible to receive one-half of the resulting savings to be spent on other unfunded or underfunded needs of the agency’s own choosing, provided that any such expenditures are consistent with the organization’s approved strategic plan and do not create a continuing funding requirement in future fiscal years unless approved by the General Assembly in the next appropriations Act; and

Where cost savings are one-time in nature, the implementing agency shall be eligible to receive one-half of the savings for one year. Where cost savings result from reductions in continuation spending, the implementing agency shall be eligible to receive one-half of the savings each year for a period of three years.

The Office of Planning and Budget must review and approve all proposed cost-saving initiatives prior to their implementation for the implementing agency to be eligible for receipt of financial incentives. However, as part of this review, the Office of Planning and Budget must consult with a cross section of agencies and the House Budget and Research Office and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall maintain records on all approved cost-saving initiatives and, with the Governor’s approval, shall reflect in the budget report submitted each year to the General Assembly the cost reductions in the affected agencies’ budgets and the resulting financial incentives by agency.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall issue rules and regulations as necessary to implement this program.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 13; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 45; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1865, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-18/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Budget and Research Office and the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office” for “House Budget Office and the Senate Budget Office” in the last sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Budget Accountability and Planning Act of 1993.’ ”